Kentucky statutes. TITLE XV Roads, Waterways, And Aviation
CHAPTER 175 Turnpike Authority

175.005.
Declaration of legislative policy. [Repealed.]

175.010.
Definitions. [Repealed.]

175.020.
Creation of Highway Authority, etc. [Repealed.]

175.030.
Initial appointments; chairman; meetings, etc. [Repealed.]

175.040.
Executive secretary. [Repealed.]

175.050.
Treasurer. [Repealed.]

175.060.
Officers, agents and employes; transfer from other state agencies. [Repealed.]

175.070.
Personal interest in contracts or sales prohibited. [Repealed.]

175.080.
Purposes and power of Authority. [Repealed.]

175.090.
Authority may exercise powers of Department of Highways; limitations. [Repealed.]

175.100.
Acquisition of property, etc. [Repealed.]

175.110.
Grade separations, construction, etc. [Repealed.]

175.120.
Leases and sales with Department of Highways, etc. [Repealed.]

175.130.
Payment of rentals by department. [Repealed.]

175.140.
Right to regulate installations owned by public or private utilities, etc. [Repealed.]

175.150.
Rates, rentals and charges for use of facilities, etc. [Repealed.]

175.160.
Authority’s power to deal with Federal agencies. [Repealed.]

175.170.
Power to incur debt and provide for payment thereof. [Repealed.]

175.180.
Issuance of bonds. [Repealed.]

175.190.
Bonds not to be debt of state, etc. [Repealed.]

175.200.
Remedies of bondholders. [Repealed.]

175.210.
Exemption from taxation. [Repealed.]

175.220.
Investment of funds in bonds issued by Authority; deposit of bonds. [Repealed.]

175.230.
Refunding bonds. [Repealed.]

175.240.
Procedure for designating receipts as trust funds, etc. [Repealed.]

175.250.
Fiscal report; annual reports. [Repealed.]

175.260.
Audits. [Repealed.]

175.270.
Covenant of Commonwealth for protection of bondholders. [Repealed.]

175.280.
Application of traffic laws to Authority’s projects, etc. [Repealed.]

175.290.
Exemption of Authority from provisions of KRS Chapters 12, 42, 45, and 56. [Repealed.]

175.300.
Construction of chapter. [Repealed.]

175.310.
Advancement of funds to Authority for initial expenses. [Repealed.]

175.320.
Expenditures for studies and plans. [Repealed.]

175.410.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the following words shall have the following respective meanings, unless another or different meaning or intent shall be clearly indicated by the context:

The word “authority” shall mean the Turnpike Authority of Kentucky;

The word “department” shall mean the Department of Highways, or, if said department shall be abolished, the bureau, board, body or commission succeeding to the principal functions thereof or to whom the powers given by KRS

177.390

to

177.570

to the department shall be given by law;

The word “project” or the words “turnpike project” shall mean any express highway or superhighway or such part or parts thereof as may be constructed by the authority under the provisions of this chapter, including all bridges, tunnels, overpasses, underpasses, interchanges, entrance plazas, approaches, connecting highways, tollhouses, service stations, garages, restaurants, and administration, storage and other buildings and facilities which the authority may deem necessary for the operation of such project, together with all property, rights, easements and interests which may be acquired by the authority or by the department for the construction or the operation of such project;

The word “cost” as applied to a turnpike project shall embrace the cost of construction, the cost of the acquisition of all land, rights of way, property, rights, easements and interests acquired for such construction, the cost of demolishing or removing any buildings or structures on land so acquired, including the cost of acquiring any lands to which such buildings or structures may be moved, the cost of all machinery and equipment, financing charges, provision for working capital in such amount as the authority shall determine to be reasonable, interest prior to and during construction and, if deemed advisable by the authority, for a period not exceeding two (2) years after completion of construction, cost of traffic estimates, engineering and legal expenses, cost of plans, specifications, surveys, estimates of cost and of revenues, other expenses as may be necessary or incident to determining the feasibility or practicability of constructing any such project, administrative expenses, and such other expense as may be necessary or incident to the construction of the project, the financing of such construction and the placing of the project in operation. Any obligation or expense hereafter incurred for a turnpike project by the authority or by the department on behalf of the authority, and any obligation or expense heretofore incurred by the department for any such turnpike project, for traffic surveys, borings, preparation of plans and specifications, engineering, and other services in connection with the construction of a project may be regarded as a part of the cost of such project and may, if advanced by the department, be reimbursed to it out of the proceeds of turnpike revenue bonds of the authority;

The words “public highways” shall include all public highways, roads and streets in the Commonwealth, whether maintained by the Commonwealth or by any county, city, town or other political subdivision or agency;

The word “bonds” or the words “revenue bonds” or “turnpike revenue bonds” shall mean revenue bonds or revenue refunding bonds of the authority issued under the provisions of this chapter;

The word “owner” shall include all individuals, copartnerships, associations, or corporations having any title or interest in any property, rights, easements or interests authorized by this chapter to be acquired;

The word “agreement” shall mean a written agreement, made by and between the authority and the department under the provisions of KRS

175.460

, providing for the financing and constructing of one (1) or more turnpike projects by the authority;

The word “lease” shall mean a written lease made by the authority as lessor and the department as lessee under the provisions of KRS

175.470

, relating to one (1) or more turnpike projects financed and constructed by the authority;

The word “biennium” or the words “biennial period” or “biennial term” shall mean the two (2) year fiscal period of the Commonwealth, commencing on July 1 in each even-numbered year and ending on June 30 in the next ensuing even-numbered year.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 173, § 3, effective March 25, 1960.

175.420.
Legislative intent.

This chapter is intended to supplement KRS

177.390

to

177.570

by providing an additional and alternative method for the provision and financing of turnpikes and appurtenant facilities to the end that such projects may be undertaken in such manner as may best be calculated to expedite relief from hazardous and congested traffic conditions on the highways in the Commonwealth and to provide acceptable avenues of commerce and intercommunication by vehicular traffic among the several sections of the Commonwealth.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 173, § 1, effective March 25, 1960.

175.425.
Purpose and status of turnpike authority.

The Turnpike Authority of Kentucky is created solely to perform essential governmental functions and to serve the public purposes of constructing, acquiring, financing and operating turnpike and other road projects for the use, safety, convenience and general welfare of the traveling public. In accomplishing such public purposes, the Turnpike Authority of Kentucky shall be and constitute a de jure municipal corporation and political subdivision of the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 202, § 1.

175.430.
Turnpike Authority of Kentucky — Composition — Meetings — Quorum — Corporate character.

The Governor, the Lieutenant Governor, the secretary of finance and administration, the State Highway Engineer, the secretary of economic development, the secretary of transportation, and the Attorney General, and their respective successors in office, shall be a body corporate and politic constituting a public corporation and governmental agency and instrumentality of the Commonwealth by the name of “The Turnpike Authority of Kentucky,” with perpetual succession and with power in that name to contract and be contracted with, sue and be sued, have and use a corporate seal, and exercise, in addition to the powers and functions specifically stated in this chapter, all of the usual powers of private corporations to the extent that the same are not inconsistent with specifically enumerated powers.

The members of the authority shall receive no compensation for their services in that capacity, but shall be entitled to reimbursement for all reasonable expenses necessarily incurred in connection with performance of their duties and functions as such members.

Four (4) members of the authority shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business, and in the absence of a quorum, one (1) or more members may adjourn from time to time until a quorum is convened. Each member may designate in writing a proxy for the transaction of business. Within ninety (90) days from March 25, 1960, the authority shall convene and organize. The Governor shall, by virtue of his office, be the chairman of the authority and the Lieutenant Governor shall in like manner be the vice chairman. The authority shall elect a secretary and a treasurer who shall not be members of the authority, each of whom shall serve at the pleasure of the authority and shall receive such compensation as may be determined by the authority with approval of the secretary of the Personnel Cabinet to be paid from the budgeted funds of the cabinet. The Treasurer shall give bond to the authority and the Commonwealth conditioned upon his faithful accounting for all funds coming into his custody from time to time, the same to be in such amount as the authority may prescribe, with corporate surety given by a surety company qualified to do business in the Commonwealth, premium therefor to be paid by the authority. The authority shall establish and maintain an office in premises which shall be provided for that purpose by the Finance and Administration Cabinet without cost to the authority; and the secretary of the authority shall at all times maintain therein complete records of all of the authority’s actions and proceedings, which shall constitute public records open to inspection at reasonable times.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 173, § 2, effective March 25, 1960; 1982, ch. 184, § 5, effective July 15, 1982; 1982, ch. 396, § 44, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 406, § 5, effective July 13, 1984; 1988, ch. 204, § 1, effective April 4, 1988; 1998, ch. 154, § 84, effective July 15, 1998.

175.440.
Authority may undertake turnpike projects pursuant to agreement with department.

In order to provide for the construction of modern express highways or superhighways embodying safety devices (including, when determined by the authority and the department to be feasible and necessary, center division, ample shoulder widths, longsight distances, two (2) or more lanes in each direction and grade separations at intersections with other highways and railroads and other appurtenances), and thereby to facilitate vehicular traffic, remove many of the present handicaps and hazards on the congested highways in the Commonwealth, and promote the agricultural and industrial development of the Commonwealth, the authority is hereby authorized and empowered, under and pursuant to the terms and provisions of a written agreement or agreements with the department as hereinafter provided, to construct, maintain, repair and operate turnpike projects, to lease such projects to the department, and to issue revenue bonds of the authority to finance such projects.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 173, § 4, effective March 25, 1960.

175.450.
General powers of authority as to turnpike projects.

The authority is hereby authorized and empowered:

To construct, reconstruct, maintain, repair, operate, and regulate turnpike projects at such locations within the Commonwealth as may be determined by the authority and the department and provided for in an agreement or agreements;

To acquire sites abutting on any turnpike project, as a part of such project, and to construct or contract for the construction of buildings and appurtenances for service stations, garages, restaurants and other services and to lease the same to parties other than the department for any of such purposes (or, if leases to such parties cannot be made on acceptable terms, to operate or to lease to the department any or all of the same) in such manner and under such terms as may be provided in an agreement;

To issue turnpike revenue bonds of the authority payable solely from the tolls, revenues, rentals and other funds pledged for their payment, for the purpose of paying all or any part of the cost of any one or more turnpike projects, and to refund any of its bonds;

To fix and revise from time to time and charge and collect tolls for transit over each turnpike project constructed by it, except to the extent that such powers are surrendered to the department pursuant to a lease;

To combine for financing purposes any two (2) or more turnpike projects;

To lease as lessor any turnpike project or projects to the department as lessee, pursuant to the terms and provisions of a lease;

To establish and enforce rules and regulations for the use of any turnpike project, except during any period when such powers are provided to be exercised by the department pursuant to a lease;

Without reference to KRS Chapter 56, to acquire and hold in the name of the authority real and personal property in the exercise of its powers and the performance of its functions and duties under this chapter, and to dispose of the same, with the approval of the department;

To designate the locations and establish, limit and control such points of ingress to and egress from each turnpike project as the authority and the department may determine to be necessary or desirable to insure the proper operation and maintenance of such project, and to prohibit entrance to such project from any point or points not so designated;

To make and enter into such contracts and agreements with the department and other parties as may be necessary or incidental to the performance of its duties and the execution of its powers under this chapter;

To employ consulting engineers, attorneys, accountants, construction and financial experts, superintendents, managers, and such other employees and agents as may be necessary in the judgment of the authority, and to fix their compensation;

To receive and accept from the Commonwealth, the department, and any federal agency, grants for or in aid of the construction of any turnpike project, and to receive and accept aid or contributions from any source of either money, property, labor or other things of value, to be held, used and applied only for the purposes for which such grants and contributions may be made;

To expend any funds provided under the authority of this chapter in advertising the facilities and services of a turnpike project or projects to the traveling public; and

To do all acts and things necessary or convenient to carry out the powers expressly granted in this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 173, § 5, effective March 25, 1960.

175.460.
Contents of agreement between authority and department.

In the event that the authority and the department shall deem it suitable, feasible, necessary and expedient that any turnpike project or projects be financed or refinanced by the authority and constructed by the authority or by the department on behalf of the authority under this chapter, the authority and the department are empowered to make one or more written agreements with regard thereto in which, as to each such project, the parties may include provisions as to any one or more of the following:

Identify the turnpike project to be financed by the authority, setting forth in general terms, subject to necessary revision from time to time as the work progresses, the principal features including geographic location, terminal points, width of right of way, number of lanes in each direction, width of traffic lanes, width of shoulders, whether there shall be center division, location and nature of access points, tunnels, bridges, overpasses, underpasses, interchanges, entrance plazas, approaches, connecting highways, tollhouses, service stations, garages, restaurants and other desired appurtenances;

Set forth what portions, if any, of the cost of the project have been or shall thereafter be contributed by the department from the funds and other resources available to it during the then current biennium and not previously obligated, which may include engineering and any other services performed by the staff of the department; and that the department, if deemed desirable, shall supervise construction on behalf of the authority upon terms which are mutually acceptable;

Set forth what portions of the cost of the project shall or may be paid from the proceeds of bonds issued by the authority under this chapter;

Set forth any agreements of the authority and the department with regard to planning, design, acquisition of property, soliciting construction bids, awarding construction contracts, issuing of work orders, and such other steps as may be necessary or incidental to the construction of the project, and authorizing and selling bonds for the project;

Agree that the project is intended to be and from and after the completion thereof will continuously constitute a link between parts of the highway system of the Commonwealth and will always be open to public travel, subject to exaction of such tolls as may be prescribed from time to time whenever and so long as the exaction of tolls may be authorized by law or required by the proceedings authorizing the issuance of the bonds or the trust indenture securing the same;

Agree that from and after the completion of the project the department will continuously pay all or any part of the cost of repairing, maintaining and operating the project as a public highway provided for the use of the Commonwealth, equitably belonging to the Commonwealth, and intended for ultimate unencumbered ownership by the Commonwealth;

Agree that upon the happening of stated events and the performance of stated conditions not inconsistent with law, the authority shall convey the project to the Commonwealth;

Set forth generally or in detail any of the terms and provisions of any lease proposed to be entered into by and between the authority and the department under the provisions of KRS

175.470

;

Agree that upon determination of the amount of bonds to be issued by the authority for the project and the interest rate or rates the bonds are to bear, and prior to the delivery of any bonds to the purchaser thereof, the rental to be paid during the term of the lease and each biennial term for which the lease may be renewed shall be established according to a method of computation set forth therein and in the proposed lease, and that the authority and the department, each by authorized persons, shall execute such lease and file the original or a signed counterpart thereof in the offices of the authority, the department and the Secretary of State of the Commonwealth; and

Agree that the department shall set aside and, except as may be provided in any lease entered into under the provisions of KRS

175.470

, pay over to the authority as revenues of the turnpike all motor fuel taxes collected by the department on gasoline and other motor fuels consumed on such turnpike, except the two-sevenths (2/7) of said motor fuel taxes provided by KRS

138.220

to be set aside for the construction, reconstruction and maintenance of rural and secondary roads.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 173, § 6, effective March 25, 1960.

175.470.
Leases between authority and department authorized — Contents.

The authority and the department are authorized and empowered to enter into a lease or leases with respect to any turnpike project or projects pursuant to any agreement or agreements made under the provisions of KRS

175.460

. Any lease may contain, in substance, any of the provisions set forth in this section and such other provisions not inconsistent herewith as the authority and the department may deem appropriate and desirable:

That the lease is for the remainder of the biennial period in which it is dated and executed, and is renewable at the option of the department for the succeeding biennial period, one (1) at a time, until the final maturity date of the bond issue to which the lease is related;

That as to the cost of maintaining, repairing and operating the project, and not otherwise, the department is contractually bound not only for the remainder of the biennial period in which the lease is dated and executed, but for the entire period of years until the final maturity of such bonds;

That with respect to the biennial period in which the lease is dated and executed, the department shall otherwise be firmly bound only (a) to contribute to the authority such portions, if any, of the cost of the project as the agreement prescribes shall be paid by the department, and (b) to pay to the authority the rental prescribed for such biennium;

That if the department shall fully perform all such obligations during such initial term of the lease, it shall have an exclusive option to renew the lease at the time and in the manner prescribed for the ensuing biennium, effective on the first day thereof; that the department shall not be or become in any way obligated to pay the rental stipulated for such biennium unless the lease be so renewed; and that the department shall, upon any such renewal, be firmly bound to pay to the authority the rental stipulated for such biennium as a general obligation of the department to be paid not only from the revenues of the project but also from any other available funds of the department not required by law or by previous binding contract to be devoted to some other purpose;

In like manner and subject to the same conditions and provisions as are set forth in subsection (4) above, if the department shall in such first ensuing biennium fully perform all its obligations and pay to the authority the rental stipulated for such biennium, the department shall have another exclusive option to renew such lease for another biennium; and so on for successive biennial terms until the final biennium for which the lease may be renewed;

That each such option of the department to renew the lease for a succeeding biennial term may be exercised at any time after the adjournment of the session of the General Assembly at which appropriations shall have been made for the operation of the state government for such succeeding biennial term, by so notifying the authority in writing signed by the commissioner of highways and delivered in the office of the authority to any officer thereof; provided, however, that such option shall be deemed automatically exercised, and the lease automatically renewed for the succeeding biennium, effective on the first day thereof, unless a written notice of the department’s election not to renew shall have been delivered in the office of the authority, to an officer thereof, before the close of business on the last working day in April immediately preceding the beginning of such succeeding biennium;

That so long as the lease is renewed from time to time and the department fully performs all its obligations as lessee, including payment of the rental stipulated in the lease, (a) the revenues of the project shall be collected, segregated, distributed, deposited, secured, disbursed and accounted for in strict conformity with the proceedings and trust indenture of the authority, and the aggregate of such revenues properly accounted for and deposited pursuant to said proceedings and trust indenture shall, if and to the extent provided in the lease, be a credit against the department’s rental or other obligations for the then current biennial term under the lease, and (b) any motor fuel taxes and surtaxes collected by the Commonwealth on gasoline and other motor fuels consumed on the project and set aside pursuant to an agreement shall be applied as provided in said proceedings and trust indenture and shall, if and to the extent provided in the lease, be a credit against the department’s rental or other obligations for the then current biennial term under the lease; and if such revenues and motor fuel taxes so provided in the lease to be a credit against the rental or other obligations of the department under the lease shall at any time appear to be insufficient to discharge such obligations in full when due and payable, the department shall estimate the rate of deficiency on a semiannual basis conforming to the interest payment dates of the bonds of the authority to which the lease is related and shall pay the amount of such estimated deficiency to the authority in equal monthly payments from any other available funds of the department not required by law or previous binding contract to be devoted to other purposes, subject to adjustment from estimated deficiencies to actual deficiencies at least thirty (30) days before each such semiannual interest payment date; provided, however, that during the department’s continuance in good standing in this respect the department shall have the right to establish, increase, decrease, suspend, or abolish the exaction of tolls, rates and charges for vehicular travel upon the project, but during any period when the department may elect to suspend or abolish the exaction of such tolls, rates and charges, it shall nevertheless continue to maintain in good operating condition, on a stand-by basis, all tollhouses, tollgates, toll-registering and toll-collecting equipment, signs, lights, fences, and other installations and facilities incident to, or used or useful in connection with, the exaction and collection of tolls, rates, and charges, in order that the same may be resumed at any time, without delay;

That in the event the lease is not renewed in accordance with its terms, or in the event it is renewed and the department shall fail to perform in full its obligations thereunder, then (a) the department shall immediately be liable for the balance of the rental stipulated for the then current biennial term for which the lease had previously been renewed, without requirement of notice or other action on the part of the authority, and shall forthwith pay such balance to the authority upon demand, (b) the department shall forfeit its then current option to renew the lease for the ensuing biennial term and its options for all future terms, (c) the right to establish, increase, decrease, suspend, abolish the exaction of, or resume tolls, rates, and charges for vehicular travel on the project shall wholly pass from the department to the authority, and (d) all motor fuel taxes collected by the Commonwealth on gasoline and other motor fuels consumed on the project, except the two-sevenths (2/7) of said motor fuel taxes provided by KRS

138.220

to be set aside for the construction, reconstruction, and maintenance of rural and secondary roads, shall thereafter be set aside and paid over to the authority as revenues of the project for deposit in the sinking fund or funds pledged to the payment of the bonds of the authority; and

In the event of the department’s forfeiture of rights as provided in subsection (8) of this section, the same may not be reassumed, nor the department restored to good standing with options to renew the lease from time to time, except in such manner as shall not be inconsistent with the rights of the holders of outstanding bonds.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 173, § 7, effective March 25, 1960.

175.480.
Policing of projects.

Every project of the authority shall be open to regular policing by the Department of Kentucky State Police as in the case of other public highways of the Commonwealth.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 173, § 8, effective March 25, 1960; 2007, ch. 85, § 183, effective June 26, 2007.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Local peace officers have concurrent jurisdiction with the state police to enforce all laws of the Commonwealth on the turnpikes.

OAG 75-210

.

175.490.
Grade separations — Relocation or vacation of existing highways — Rights of access — Regulations as to public utility facilities on or along turnpike projects.

The authority shall have power to construct grade separations at intersections of any turnpike project or projects with public highways and to change and adjust the lines and grades of such highways so as to accommodate the same to the design of such grade separation. The cost of such grade separations and any damage incurred in changing and adjusting the lines and grades of highways shall be a part of the cost of such turnpike project.

If the authority shall find it necessary to change the location or grade of any portion of any public highway, it shall cause the same to be reconstructed at such location as the authority and the department shall deem most favorable and of substantially the same type and in as good condition as the original highway. The cost of such reconstruction and any damage incurred in changing the location or grade of any such highway shall be a part of the cost of such turnpike project.

Any public highway affected by the construction of any turnpike project may be vacated or relocated by the authority, with the approval of the department, in the manner now provided by law for the vacation or relocation of public roads and any damages awarded on account thereof shall be a part of the cost of such project.

The authority and its authorized agents and employees may enter upon any lands, waters and premises in the Commonwealth for the purpose of making such surveys, soundings, drillings and examinations as they may deem necessary or convenient for the purpose of this chapter, and such entry shall not be deemed a trespass, nor shall an entry for such purposes be deemed an entry under any condemnation proceedings which may be then pending. The authority shall make reimbursement to the owners for any actual damage resulting to such lands, waters and premises as a result of such activities on behalf of the authority, and the same shall be a part of the cost of such project.

The authority shall have power to make reasonable regulations for the installation, construction, maintenance, repair, renewal, relocation and removal of tracks, pipes, mains, conduits, cables, wires, towers, poles and other equipment and appliances (herein called “public utility facilities”) of any public utility in, on, along, over or under any turnpike project. Whenever the authority shall determine that it is necessary that any such public utility facilities which now are, or hereafter may be, located in, on, along, over or under any turnpike project should be relocated in such turnpike project, or should be removed from such turnpike project, the public utility owning or operating such facilities shall relocate or remove the same in accordance with the order of the authority; provided, however, that the cost and expense of such relocation or removal, including the cost of installing such facilities in a new location or new locations, and the cost of any lands, or any rights or interests in lands, and any other rights, acquired to accomplish such relocation or removal, shall be a part of the cost of such turnpike project. In case of any such relocation or removal of facilities, the public utility owning or operating the same, its successors or assigns, may maintain and operate such facilities, with the necessary appurtenances, in the new location or new locations, for as long a period, and upon the same terms and conditions, as it had the right to maintain and operate such facilities in their former location or locations. No utility shall have the privilege of establishing its lines or properties within the right of way of a turnpike which has been constructed or is owned, maintained or operated by the authority, except upon the conditions and terms prescribed by the authority; however, a utility shall be permitted to connect its lines with service stations, garages, restaurants and other installations permitted by the authority to exist upon the right of way of the turnpike.

Costs and expenses incurred by the authority as permitted by subsections (1), (2), (3), (4) and (5) of this section may, as provided in the applicable agreement or lease, (a) be paid by the authority from the proceeds of revenue bonds issued by it for financing the turnpike project or projects, or (b) be paid by the department from available funds without reimbursement, or (c) be advanced by the department and reimbursed to it from the proceeds of bonds issued for the project or projects under this chapter.

The Commonwealth hereby consents to the use of all lands owned by it, including lands lying under water, which are deemed by the authority to be necessary for the construction or operation of any turnpike project.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 173, § 9, effective March 25, 1960.

175.500.
Turnpike revenue bonds of the authority.

The authority is authorized to provide, at one (1) time or from time to time, for the issuance of its turnpike revenue bonds for the purpose of paying all or any part of the cost of any one (1) or more turnpike projects undertaken pursuant to an agreement and lease. The principal of and the interest on the bonds shall be payable solely from the funds provided for the payment. The bonds of any issue may be in one (1) or more series and any one (1) or more series may enjoy equal or subordinate status with respect to the pledge of funds from which they are payable, shall be dated, shall bear interest at a rate or rates or method of determining rates, shall mature at a time or times not exceeding forty (40) years from their date or dates, all as may be provided by the authority, and may be made redeemable before maturity, at the option of the authority, at a price or prices and under terms and conditions as may be fixed by the authority prior to the issuance of the bonds. The authority shall determine the form of the bonds, including any interest coupons to be attached to the bonds, and shall fix the denomination or denominations of the bonds and the place or places for payment of principal and interest, which may be at any bank or trust company within or without the Commonwealth. The bonds shall be signed by the facsimile signature of the chairman of the authority, and the seal of the authority or a facsimile of the seal shall be affixed to the bonds and attested by the manual signature of the secretary of the authority, and any coupons attached to the bonds shall bear the facsimile signature of the chairman of the authority. In case any officer whose signature or a facsimile of whose signature shall appear on any bonds or coupons shall cease to be an officer before the delivery of the bonds, the signature or facsimile shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes the same as if he had remained in office until delivery of the bonds. All bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter shall have and are declared to have all the qualities and incidents of negotiable instruments under the negotiable instruments law of the Commonwealth. The bonds may be issued in coupon or in registered form, or both, as the authority may determine, and provision may be made for the registration of any coupon bonds as to principal alone and also as to both principal and interest, and for the reconversion into coupon bonds of any bonds registered as to both principal and interest. The authority may sell the bonds in a manner, either at public or private sale, and for a price as it may determine will best effect the purposes of this chapter.

The proceeds of the bonds of each issue shall be used solely for the payment of the cost of the turnpike project or projects for which the bonds shall have been issued, and shall be disbursed in a manner and under the restrictions, if any, as the authority may provide in the proceedings authorizing the issuance of the bonds or in the trust indenture securing the bonds. If the proceeds of the bonds of any issue, by error of estimates or otherwise, shall be less than the cost, additional bonds may be issued to provide the amount of the deficit, and, unless otherwise provided in the proceedings authorizing the issuance of the bonds or in the trust indenture securing the bonds, shall be deemed to be of the same issue and shall be entitled to payment from the same fund without preference or priority of the bonds first issued. If the proceeds of the bonds of any issue shall exceed the cost, the surplus shall be deposited to the credit of the sinking fund or funds for the bonds or any account or accounts as the authority shall have provided in the proceedings or trust indenture authorizing and securing the bonds.

Prior to the preparation of definitive bonds, the authority may, under like restrictions, issue interim receipts or temporary bonds, with or without coupons, exchangeable for definitive bonds when the bonds shall have been executed and are available for delivery. The authority may also provide for the replacement of any bonds which shall become mutilated or shall be destroyed or lost. Bonds may be issued under the provisions of this chapter without obtaining the consent of any department, division, commission, board, bureau, or agency of the Commonwealth, and without any other proceedings or the happening of any other conditions or things, except as specifically required by this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 173, § 10; 1968, ch. 110, § 21; 1996, ch. 274, § 37, effective July 15, 1996.